Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-147
National Guard; officers; retired at higher grade, when.

The Governor shall have the power, on good cause shown, to retire any officer in the next higher grade than that held by the officer during his active military service in the National Guard.

Laws 1955, c. 213, § 2, p. 598;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-121.02;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 45, p. 1596.